North Dakota, session 69, SB2325.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 47-05 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Easements granted to a nonfederal party within a wetland - Restrictions - Liability .
1. Before a real property owner grants an easement within a wetland of this state to any
person, except the federal government, the grantor of the easement shall request the
department of water resources or appropriate federal agency to determine the ordinary
high water mark of the area subject to the easement. All easement holders having
obtained an easement subject to this section before Augus t 1, 2025, shall obtain an
ordinary high water mark determination from the department of water resources or
appropriate federal agency.
2. Upon determining the ordinary high water mark of the affected areas, the easement
holder shall record a copy of the easement, the ordinary high water mark
determination issued by the department of water resources or appropriate federal
agency, and a map of the area subject to the easement with the county recorder of the
county in which the majority of the easement area is situated. If the water level
exceeds the ordinary high water mark within the easement area, the easement holder
is liable for civil damages to any person aggrieved by damages to crops, county and
township roads, railroad infrastructure, and private property caused by the flow of
water above the ordinary high water mark.
Page No. 1 25.0953.03000